Hawaii statutes.
[§171-4.5] Aha moku advisory committee;
established. (a) There is established the aha moku advisory committee to
be placed within the department of land and natural resources for
administrative purposes. The committee may advise the chairperson of the board
of land and natural resources in carrying out the purposes of this section.

(b) The committee shall consist of eight
members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate from a list of
nominations submitted by the aha moku councils of each island. Oversight of
the aha moku advisory committee shall be by the chairperson of the board of
land and natural resources. The committee members shall select the committee
chairperson from among the members.

(c) The members shall not receive compensation
for their service, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses, including
travel expenses, incurred while participating in meetings and events approved
in advance by the chairperson of the board of land and natural resources.

The aha moku advisory committee may hire an
executive director who shall be exempt from chapter 76. The executive director
may hire an administrative or executive assistant to assist the executive
director in accomplishing the purposes of the aha moku advisory committee.

(d) The aha moku advisory committee may
provide advice on the following:

(1) Integrating indigenous resource management
practices with western management practices in each moku;

(2) Identifying a comprehensive set of indigenous
practices for natural resource management;

(3) Fostering the understanding and practical use of
native Hawaiian resource knowledge, methodology, and expertise;

(4) Sustaining the State's marine, land, cultural,
agricultural, and natural resources;

(5) Providing community education and fostering
cultural awareness on the benefits of the aha moku system;

(6) Fostering protection and conservation of the
State's natural resources; and

(7) Developing an administrative structure that
oversees the aha moku system.

(e) The committee shall submit an annual
report in English and Hawaiian to the legislature and the chairperson of the
board of land and natural resources no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular legislative session. The annual report shall include
a list of all recommendations made by the committee and the resulting action
taken by the department over the course of the prior year. [L 2012, c 288, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next